Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.40.010

Findings—Intent. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) The people of the state of Washington find and declare that:

(a) The financial strength of certain individuals or organizations should not permit them to exercise a disproportionate or controlling influence on the election of candidates.

(b) Rapidly increasing political campaign costs have led many candidates to raise larger percentages of money from special interests with a specific financial stake in matters before state government. This has caused the public perception that decisions of elected officials are being improperly influenced by monetary contributions.

(c) Candidates are raising less money in small contributions from individuals and more money from special interests. This has created the public perception that individuals have an insignificant role to play in the political process.

(2) By limiting campaign contributions, the people intend to:

(a) Ensure that individuals and interest groups have fair and equal opportunity to influence elective and governmental processes;

(b) Reduce the influence of large organizational contributors; and

(c) Restore public trust in governmental institutions and the electoral process.

[ 2024 c 164 s 443; 2010 c 204 s 601; 1993 c 2 s 1 (Initiative Measure No. 134, approved November 3, 1992). Formerly RCW 42.17A.400, 42.17.610.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Short title—1993 c 2: "This act may be known and cited as the Fair Campaign Practices Act." [ 1993 c 2 s 36 (Initiative Measure No. 134, approved November 3, 1992). Formerly RCW 42.17A.909, 42.17.955.]